Indiana, session 2026, HB1243.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-9-37-14 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) With respect
to a property owner who has secured the right to pay the property
owner's assessments in deferred installments by the filing of a waiver,
may, the municipal works board shall establish a policy to permit
an owner of real property in the municipality to prepay the
property owner's assessment in full by either of the following
methods:
(1) At any time after the expiration of the first year after the filing,
pay the entire balance of the assessment and be relieved of the
lien on the property owner's property. A property owner may not
pay the property owner's entire balance under this subsection
unless at the same time the property owner pays all interest due
at the next interest paying period.
(2) At any time, including within the year of the filing, pay the
entire balance of the assessment and be relieved of the lien on
the property owner's property. A property owner may not
2026 IN 1243—LS 6919/DI 129


pay the property owner's entire balance under this subsection
unless at the same time the property owner pays all interest
due at the next interest paying period.
(b) If a person who exercises the right to prepay the person's
assessment fully pays the assessment and interest, all interest and
liability as to the assessed property ceases.
2026 IN 1243—LS 6919/DI 129